Washington statutes.
RCW 18.30.130

License renewal.

The board shall establish by rule the requirements for renewal of licenses to practice denturism, but shall not increase the licensure requirements provided in this chapter. The secretary shall establish administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for license periods and renewals as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 2013 c 171 s 5; 1996 c 191 s 13; 1995 c 198 s 23; 1995 c 1 s 14 (Initiative Measure No. 607, approved November 8, 1994).]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 198 ss 18-25: See note following RCW 18.30.020.